nb: Bruksområde for førstehjelpssett: Sykkel; Bil; Hjem; Industriell; Kjæledyr; Sport; Reise; Annet
hu: Elsősegélykészlet használata: Kerékpár; Autó; Otthon; Ipari; Kisállatok; Sport; Utazás; Egyéb
es: Uso del botiquín de primeros auxilios: Bicicleta; Auto; Hogar; Industrial; Mascotas; Deportivo; Viajar; Otros
fr: Utilisation de la trousse de premiers secours: Vélo; Voiture; Maison; Industriel; Animaux de compagnie; Sport; Voyage; Autre
ja: 救急セットの用途: 自転車; 車; 家; 産業; ペット; スポーツ; 旅行; その他
hr-HR: Upotreba kompleta za prvu pomoć: Bicikl; Automobil; Dom; Industrijski; Kućni ljubimci; Sport; Putovanje; Ostalo
en: First aid kit usage: Bicycle; Car; Home; Industrial; Pets; Sport; Travel; Other
zh-TW: 急救工具包用途: 自行車; 車; 家; 工業; 寵物; 運動; 旅行; 其他
nl: Gebruik EHBO-doos: Fiets; Auto; Thuis; Industrieel; Huisdieren; Sport; Reizen; Andere
pt-BR: Uso do kit de primeiros socorros: Bicicleta; Carro; Lar; Industrial; Animais de estimação; Esporte; Viagem; Outro
vi: Cách sử dụng bộ sơ cứu: Xe đạp; Ô tô; Chỗ ở; Công nghiệp; Vật nuôi; Sport; Du lịch; Khác
cs: Účel lékárničky: Jízdní kolo; Automobil; Domov; Průmyslový; Domácí mazlíčci; Sport; Cestování; Jiné
zh-CN: 急救包使用: 自行车; 汽车; 家; 工业; 宠物; 体育; 旅行; 其他
pt-PT: Utilização do kit de primeiros socorros: Bicicleta; Carro; Casa; Industrial; Animais de estimação; Desporto; Viagens; Outro
el: Χρήση κιτ πρώτων βοηθειών: Ποδήλατο; Αυτοκίνητο; Σπίτι; Βιομηχανικό; Κατοικίδια; Αθλητισμός; Ταξίδι; Άλλο
ru: Назначение набора для оказания первой помощи: Велосипед; Автомобиль; Дом; Промышленный; Домашние животные; Спорт; Путешествие; Другой
pl: Zastosowanie apteczki pierwszej pomocy: Rower; Samochód; Strona główna; Przemysłowy; Zwierzęta domowe; Sport; Podróże; Inne
sv: Användning av förstahjälpenutrustning: Cykel; Bil; Hem; Industriell; Husdjur; Sport; Resor; Övrigt
fi: Ensiapulaukun käyttö: Polkupyörä; Auto; Koti; Teollinen; Lemmikit; Urheilu; Matkailu; Muu
sl-SI: Uporaba kompleta prve pomoči: Kolo; Avtomobilski; Doma; Industrijska; Hišni ljubljenčki; Šport; Potovanje; Drugo
ko: 구급약품 키트 용도: 자전거; 자동차; 집; 인더스트리얼; 반려 동물; 스포츠; 여행; 기타
bg-BG: Използване на комплект за първа помощ: Велосипед; Автомобил; Домашен; Индустриален; Домашни любимци; Спорт; Пътуване; Други
lt-LT: Pirmosios pagalbos vaistinėlės paskirtis: Dviračiui; Automobilinė; Namų; Pramoninė; Naminiams gyvūnams; Sportui; Kelioninė; Kita
sk-SK: Použitie lekárničky: Bicykel; Auto; Domáci; Priemyselný; Domáce zvieratá; Šport; Cestovanie; Iné
it: Utilizzo del kit di primo soccorso: Bicicletta; Automobile; Casa; Industriale; Animali domestici; Sport; Viaggio; Altro
da: Brug af førstehjælpskasse: Cykel; Bil; Hjem; Industri; Kæledyr; Sport; Rejse; Andet
th: การใช้ชุดปฐมพยาบาล: จักรยาน; รถยนต์; บ้าน; อุตสาหกรรม; สัตว์เลี้ยง; กีฬา; การท่องเที่ยว; อื่นๆ
de: Verwendung des Erste-Hilfe-Sets: Fahrrad; Pkw; Heim; Industriell; Haustiere; Sport; Reisen; Sonstiges
tr: İlk yardım çantası kullanımı: Bisiklet; Araba; Ev; Endüstriyel; Evcil hayvanlar; Spor; Seyahat; Diğer
ro-RO: Destinație de utilizare trusă de prim ajutor: Bicicletă; Mașină; Locuință; Industrial; Animale de companie; Sport; Voiaj; Altele